Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 44 Mobile and Manufactured Homes
31-44-4.
Sale of mobile and manufactured homes.

No owner of a mobile and manufactured home park shall deny any resident the right to sell his or her mobile and manufactured home owned by him or her while the mobile and manufactured home is in the park or require the resident to remove the mobile and manufactured home because of the sale of the home, except as provided in this section.

A mobile and manufactured home park licensee, directly or indirectly engaged in the business of selling mobile and manufactured homes, may impose conditions on the rental or occupancy of a new lot, including the right to sell the first unit or impose an entrance fee on that lot.

An owner of a mobile home or manufactured home remaining within the park may utilize one of the following methods in selling the home to a qualified buyer:

Sell the home through his or her own individual efforts;

List the home with a licensed real estate broker at a commission not to exceed ten percent (10%);

List the home with park licensee at a commission not to exceed ten percent (10%).

The mobile and manufactured home commission shall provide recommendations for screening of prospective purchasers by the park licensees.

No licensee shall exact a commission or fee with respect to the price realized by the resident, except as provided in this section, unless he or she has acted as agent for the resident in a sale pursuant to a written contract.

No owner of a mobile and manufactured home park shall make or enforce any rules which require any resident to sell his or her mobile and manufactured home to the owner.

No owner of a mobile and manufactured home park shall make any rule or enter into a contract, which shall abrogate or limit the tenant’s right to place “for sale” signs on or in his or her mobile manufactured housing. However, the park owner may by rule or contract provision impose reasonable limitations as to size, quality registration of the signs, requirements that the posting of the signs be pursuant to bona fide efforts to sell, and removal when the home is no longer being offered for sale. No limitation as to size or quality shall restrict the use of painted or printed signs which are two feet (2´) by two feet (2´) or less in size and which contains no more than “for sale,” “address” and “phone number”.

An owner may refuse to sell a mobile and manufactured home, allow a mobile and manufactured home to remain in the park, or to approve entry to the mobile and manufactured home park for good cause. For the purpose of this section, “good cause” means a reasonable cause for the owner to believe:

That the purchaser will not meet the entry requirements for the park and the entry requirements are equally applied by the owner to all purchasers and prospective residents;

That the purchaser intends to utilize that purchased mobile and manufactured home for an illegal purpose or for any purpose that would disturb the quiet enjoyment of the other residents of the park;

That the purchaser is or will be financially unable to pay the rent for the mobile and manufactured home space or lot upon which the purchased mobile and manufactured home is located;

An owner may require the removal of a mobile home being sold whose age and condition does not meet the standards of mobile homes in the park; or

No owner or operator of a mobile and manufactured home park shall require a mobile or manufactured home at the time of sale or foreclosure, which is safe, sanitary, and in conformance with aesthetic standards, to be removed from the park; provided that this clause (5) shall not apply where the owner or operator has initiated the foreclosure as mortgagee.

Any resident or prospective resident who is aggrieved pursuant to this subsection, shall have the right to petition the director for a hearing within twenty (20) days of the alleged violation by the owner. Said hearing shall occur within thirty (30) days from the receipt of said petition. The director or his or her designee shall take all reasonable action to effectuate prompt resolution of said claim and shall render a decision within fifteen (15) days of the conclusion of said hearing.

A mobile and manufactured home shall be presumed to be safe if it is established that the mobile and manufactured home was constructed to any nationally recognized building or construction code or standard. Failure to meet any standard or code shall raise no presumption that the mobile manufactured home is unsafe; nor may the failure be used as a reason for withholding approval of an on site sale.

The mobile and manufactured home park owner shall have the burden of showing that a mobile and manufactured home is unsafe, unsanitary, or fails to meet the aesthetic standards of the development. No aesthetic standard shall be applied against a mobile and manufactured home if the standard relates to physical characteristics, such as size, original construction materials, or color which cannot be changed without undue hardship to the tenant.

Any homeowner wishing to sell his or her home must request in writing a statement of the park owner’s intentions regarding the conditions of the dwelling. Within ten (10) days of the receipt of the request of the homeowner for the park owner’s intentions, the park owner must approve the home’s condition for resale or deliver a written statement specifying ways in which the home is not safe, sanitary, or in conformance with aesthetic standards. Failure of the park owner to respond within ten (10) days shall be deemed approval of the home’s condition for resale.

In the event of resale or resiting of a mobile and manufactured home, the local building official in the city or town where the mobile and manufactured home is to be located shall, upon the request of either party, inspect the unit and shall issue a certificate of approval in the case of an on site sale or a certificate of occupancy in the case of resiting, to the owner of the unit, provided the authority finds the unit safe for human habitation and the site meets local zoning requirements. A fee of not more than thirty dollars ($30.00) may be charged for the inspection by building officials.

No licensee shall discriminate in the treatment of tenants of mobile and manufactured homes as the result of the sale of the home, whether the tenant is the tenant prior or subsequent to the sale.

Every person who sells a mobile and/or manufactured home shall warrant to the buyer that the home is free and clear of all liens and if the seller violates the warranty, then the seller shall be strictly liable to the buyer in damages.

Every person who sells a mobile and/or manufactured home in this state which will be located at a mobile or manufactured home park in this state and retains a secured interest in the mobile and/or manufactured home shall file a notice of the lien with the recorder of deeds of the city or town within which the park is located as allowed by the provisions of §

34-13-8

and with the uniform commercial code division of the department of state.

Prior to the execution of a purchase and sale agreement, every owner of a mobile and manufactured home park, shall disclose to the prospective purchaser the rental history for the preceding three (3) years of the land on which the home will be located.

The owner of a mobile and manufactured home park shall not require the purchaser to provide the names of more than three (3) references from whom the park owner can seek information concerning the behavior and financial reliability of the purchaser; nor shall the purchaser be required to obtain a written report from any reference; the park owner shall not require the purchaser to submit copies of any personal income tax returns in order to obtain approval for residency in the park. However, the park owner may require the purchaser to document the amount and source of his or her gross monthly income or means of financial support. If the park owner or management rejects a purchaser as a prospective homeowner, the ownership or management shall inform the selling homeowner in writing no later than ten (10) days of its reasons for the rejection. If the approval of a purchaser is withheld for any reason other than those stated in these articles, the park owner or management may be held liable for all damages proximately resulting in it.

The park owner or management may require the right of prior approval of a purchaser of a mobile and manufactured home that will remain in the park and that the selling homeowner or his or her agent give notice of the sale to the park owner or management before the close of the sale. Approval cannot be withheld if the purchaser has the financial ability to pay the rent and charges of the park unless the park owner or management reasonably determines that, based on the purchaser’s prior tenancies, he or she will not comply with the rules and regulations of the park.

If the park owner or management collects a fee or charge from a prospective purchaser of a mobile and manufactured home in order to obtain a financial report or credit rating, the full amount of the fee or charge shall be credited toward payment of the first month’s rent for that mobile and manufactured home purchaser.

If, for whatever reason, the prospective purchaser is rejected by the park owner or management, the park owner or management shall refund to the prospective purchaser the full amount of that fee or charge within thirty (30) days from the date of rejection. If the prospective purchaser is approved by the park owner or management, but, for whatever reason, the prospective purchaser elects not to purchase the mobile or manufactured home, the park owner or management may retain the fee, or a portion of it, to defray its administrative costs under this section.

No owner or operator of a mobile and manufactured home park shall require any person as a precondition to renting, leasing, or otherwise occupying a space for mobile and manufactured housing in a mobile and manufactured home park to pay any fee of any kind, unless services are actually rendered. The park owner or management shall not perform any service unless so requested in writing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 79, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 173, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 456, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 234, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 146, § 1.

31-44-4.1.
Recording of sale or transfer documents — Penalties.

Every deed, instrument, or writing by which an interest in any mobile or manufactured home is granted, assigned, transferred, or otherwise conveyed to, or vested in, a purchaser or purchasers, or any other person or persons, shall be filed with the recorder of deeds of the city or town in within which the mobile home or manufactured home is located, within ten (10) days after execution of the deed instrument, or writing. The fee for the filing shall be in accordance with §

34-13-7

. The city or town shall assess a fine to be determined by each city or town for failure to comply with the provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 319, § 1.

31-44-5.
Reprisals.

No licensee shall take reprisal(s) against a resident or prospective resident or association formed pursuant to §

31-44-3.1

.

An increase in rent, nonrenewal of lease, refusal to offer a lease, or termination of tenancy, taken by a licensee against a resident, prospective resident, or association within six (6) months after the resident, prospective resident, or association has taken any protected lawful action, shall create a rebuttable presumption that the act by the licensee is a reprisal. Reprisal may be pleaded as a defense in any court proceeding brought against a resident or prospective resident after he or she has taken any protected lawful action.

In addition to any other remedy under this chapter, a resident, prospective resident, or association who has been the subject of a reprisal shall be entitled to the remedies provided for retaliatory actions in §

34-18-46

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 182, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 57, § 1.

31-44-6.
Notice of judgment.

In any action to enforce the provisions of this chapter, the clerk of the court shall mail copies of any final judgment, decree, permanent injunction, arbitration decision or order of the court upon the entry of it to the attorney general and if licenses are involved, the department of business regulation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1.

31-44-7.
Lease.

All terms and conditions of the occupancy must be fully disclosed in a written lease by the mobile and manufactured home park owner to any prospective mobile and manufactured home park resident at a reasonable time prior to the rental or occupancy of a mobile and manufactured home space or lot. The disclosures shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

The licensee shall agree at all times during the tenancy to:

Maintain the premises when necessary to prevent the accumulation of stagnant water;

Keep each mobile and manufactured home space or lot marked in such a way that each resident will be certain of his or her area of responsibility;

Keep any exterior area of the mobile and manufactured home park within his or her control, not the responsibility of each resident, free from any species of weed or plant growth which are noxious or detrimental to the health of the residents;

Be responsible for the extermination of any insect, rodent, vermin, or other pest dangerous to the health of the residents whenever infestation exists in the area of the mobile and manufactured home park not the responsibility of the resident or in the area for which the resident is responsible including the mobile and manufactured home if the infestation is not the fault of the resident and particularly if the infestation existed prior to the occupancy of the resident claiming relief;

Maintain all mobile and manufactured homes rented by the owner in a condition which is structurally sound and capable of withstanding adverse effects of weather conditions;

Maintain all electrical, plumbing, gas, or other utilities provided by the licensee in good working condition. In the event of any repairs or construction to any utility in any mobile and manufactured home park, written notice shall be given twenty-four (24) hours prior to the repairs or construction to each tenant of the mobile and manufactured home park, except in cases of emergencies, after which any repair shall be completed within seventy-two (72) hours unless good cause is shown as to why the action or repair has not been completed. No utility shall be discontinued during the repairs or construction for more than three (3) consecutive hours unless the plans have been reviewed by the city or town engineer;

Maintain all utilities provided to mobile and manufactured homes within the park up to and including the connection to the individual mobile/manufactured home, and all water and sewage lines and connections in good working order, and in the event of any emergency, make necessary arrangements if possible for the provisions of the service on a temporary basis; and there shall be no additional charge for the use of water because a resident has children;

If the park operator fails to comply with paragraph (vi) or (vii) of this subdivision, the resident may notify the park operator of the resident’s intention to correct the condition at the park operator’s expense. After being notified by the resident in writing, if the park operator fails to comply within fourteen (14) days or more promptly as conditions reasonably require in case of emergency, the resident may cause the work to be done by a contractor and, after submitting to the park operator an itemized statement, deduct from the resident’s rent the actual and reasonable cost of the work.

Respect the privacy of the resident and if only the mobile and manufactured home space or lot is rented, agree to enter the mobile and manufactured home only with the permission of the owner only after notice to the resident;

Allow all residents freedom of choice in the purchase of all services, pursuant to §

31-44-3

“rules and regulations”;

Allow a resident to terminate a rental agreement whenever a change in the location of the resident’s employment requires a change in the location of his or her residence if the resident gives thirty (30) days notice; provided, that a resident who is a member of the armed forces of the United States may terminate his or her rental agreement with less than thirty (30) days if he or she receives reassignment orders which do not allow prior notification;

Maintain any road in the mobile and manufactured home park within the licensee’s control in good condition, provide adequate space for parking of one car for each lot and be responsible for damage to any vehicle, excluding damages from speed bumps, which is the direct result of any unrepaired or poorly maintained access road within the park and that is within the licensee’s control;

Make reasonable rules for guest parking which shall be clearly stated in the rules of the park;

Provide a written lease having a term of not less than one year unless the resident requests, in writing, a term for less than one year, or unless a resident in writing states that he or she does not desire a written lease; provided, nothing in this section shall prevent prospective residents from assuming from the current resident the balance of leasehold if same shall have a period of less than one year; provided further the notice of any rental increase shall be provided to the prospective resident in the event that less than sixty (60) days of the leasehold is remaining on the assumed portion of the lease.

The resident shall agree at all times during the tenancy to:

Keep the unit and his or her area of responsibility as marked by the owner in a clean and sanitary condition, free of garbage and rubbish;

Keep the supplied, basic facilities including any plumbing fixture, cooking and refrigeration equipment, and electrical fixtures in a rented mobile and manufactured home unit in a clean and sanitary condition and exercise reasonable care in their proper use and operation;

Observe all reasonable rules and regulations of the licensee concerning the use, occupation, and maintenance of the premises, provided the rules and regulations comply with the provisions of §

31-44-3

;

Any action on the part of the resident which may be grounds for eviction from the mobile and manufactured home park or termination of the rental agreement shall be clearly stated in it.

The terms for the payment of rent shall be clearly set forth and any charges for services, mobile and manufactured home space or lot rent, unit rent, or any other charge shall be specifically itemized in the rental agreement and in any billing to the resident by the owner. The total rent for the term of the rental agreement shall be stated in it.

The right of the mobile and manufactured home park owner to designate himself or herself as the sole and exclusive agent for the sale of any mobile and manufactured home pursuant to §

31-44-4

“sale of mobile and manufactured homes” of this chapter shall be clearly stated in the rental agreement.

The lease prescribed by this chapter shall not contain the following:

Any provision allowing less than a seven (7) day grace period in which to pay rent without the assessment of a late charge;

Any provision allowing the licensee to assess a late charge in excess of five percent (5%) of the monthly rent due;

Any provision which allows the owner to increase the total rent or change the payment arrangements during the term of the rental agreement; provided that prorated increases for increased taxes only may be added if stated in the original lease;

Any provision allowing the owner to charge an entrance fee to a resident assuming occupancy, except as provided in this section;

Any provision which denies to the resident the right to treat as a breach of the agreement, a continuing violation by the owner, substantial in nature, of any provisions set forth in the lease or of any state statute unless the owner discontinues the violation within a reasonable time after written notice is given by the resident by registered or certified mail;

Any provision waiving the restrictions of §

31-44-7.1

;

Except as provided in this section, the lease shall be signed by both the mobile and manufactured home park licensee and the mobile and manufactured home park resident and shall contain the notice set forth in §

31-44-8

, printed verbatim in a clear and conspicuous manner.

It shall be the obligation of the licensee to abide by all the terms and conditions set forth in this section notwithstanding the execution of written lease of any resident.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 109, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 140, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 278, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 519, § 1.

31-44-7.1.
Security deposits.

In any rental agreement for the lease of a mobile home in which the licensee requires the payment of a security deposit by the resident:

The deposit shall accumulate interest on an annual basis at the rate of three percent (3%).

No deposit will be required which is more than the amount of one month’s rent.

The interest shall be paid to the resident annually or upon termination of the rental.

Upon termination of the rental, the licensee shall return the deposit along with accumulated interest within thirty (30) days, or shall provide the resident with a written itemized list of damages caused by the resident during the rental, other than ordinary wear and tear, and return to the resident the difference, if any, between the deposit and interest and the damages sustained.

The resident shall provide the licensee with a forwarding address upon vacating the premises so as to permit the licensee to return the deposit.

If the licensee fails to either return the deposit within thirty (30) days or pay interest on it, he or she shall be liable for damages not to exceed twice the amount of the deposit and three (3) times the amount of interest due.

Any security deposits received by the licensee shall be deposited in a savings account and earmarked specifically as a security deposit account, and that fund shall not be used by the licensee for any purpose except as provided in subdivision (4) of this section.

No security deposit shall be required for the rental of a mobile home lot or space.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 308, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 45.

31-44-7.2.
Trailer parks located within the town of Exeter.

Any agreement for the lease of a mobile home or a mobile home lot or space located within the town of Exeter and offered pursuant to the provisions of §

31-44-7

, must be in writing and shall not be executed unless each term of it either shall have been completed in full or shall contain a statement that the terms may not be applicable. All lease agreements executed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be executed in duplicate original, one of which shall be provided to the lessee within thirty (30) days of its execution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 422, § 1.

31-44-8.
Notice required by law.

The following notice must be given by the licensee to the tenant prior to occupancy:

“The terms of your tenancy must be in accordance with the Rhode Island Mobile and Manufactured Home Act, title 31, chapter 44. Section

31-44-3

requires all the rules and regulations governing your tenancy to be fair and reasonable. Unreasonable rules, or those not in compliance with §

31-44-3

, cannot be enforced against you.

“No licensee may offer a mobile and manufactured home or a mobile and manufactured home space or lot for rent without showing to the prospective resident a copy of the written lease before the resident occupies that mobile and manufactured home space or lot. No licensee may rent a mobile and manufactured home or mobile and manufactured home space or lot until a written lease has been signed by the resident and the owner. The term of the lease shall not be less than one year unless the resident requests, in writing, a term for less than one year, or requests in writing that he or she does not desire a written lease.

“The licensee of this park shall not require you to deal exclusively with a certain fuel dealer or other merchant for goods or services in connection with the use or occupancy of your mobile and manufactured home lot unless that restriction is necessary to protect the health, safety, or welfare of mobile and manufactured home residents in the park. If you are required to deal with a certain dealer or merchant, the price you pay for such goods or services may not be more than the prevailing price in this locality for similar goods and services.

“An increase in fees or rent, nonrenewal of lease, refusal to offer a lease, or termination of tenancy which is taken against you by a licensee as a penalty for reporting a violation of the Mobile and Manufactured Home Act or of any applicable building or health code, or for any other justified complaint to a governmental authority is a reprisal and is prohibited by law.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 119, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 146, § 1.

31-44-9.
Enforceability.

Any provision of this chapter and any provision of a license issued pursuant to this chapter may be enforced by the department of business regulation. In addition to and notwithstanding any action taken by or pending at the department of business regulation, any resident of a mobile home park may seek to enforce any provision of a license or this chapter by civil action in the court exercising jurisdiction over the subject matter. However, failure to comply with tax laws and violations of land use regulations and water supply and sewage disposal requirements shall be subject to the jurisdiction of and shall be enforceable by, the municipality in which the park is located and/or the state agency having regulatory authority over the matter. (b) Any park owner or operator who violates any of the provisions of §§

31-44-3

,

31-44-3.1

,

31-44-3.2

,

31-44-4

,

31-44-5

,

31-44-7

,

31-44-7.1

,

31-44-7

.2,

31-44-8

and

31-44-13

shall be deemed to have engaged in an unfair and deceptive trade practice under §

6-13.1-2

and, in addition to other remedies, shall be subject to the enforcement provisions of that chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 182, § 1.

31-44-9.1.
Remedies.

In addition to any other remedy authorized by law, equity or regulation, the director of the department may order, following notice and opportunity to be heard, the owner and residents of any mobile and manufactured home park to pay monthly rents directly to an interest bearing escrow account established by and under the control of, the director and may make the payment of those amounts to the owner of the mobile and manufactured home park contingent on the owner’s submission of satisfactory evidence of compliance with all orders of the director. Upon submission of evidence of compliance, the director shall promptly cause any escrowed rents to be paid to the owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 2.

31-44-9.2.
Investigations.

When, in the opinion of the director, sufficient cause exists to begin an investigation of alleged violations of any provision of this chapter or a license issued pursuant to this chapter, the director may commence an investigation of any act or practice or failure to act of any mobile and manufactured home park owner or operator and may bill the costs of the investigation to the mobile home park owner or operator. However, the investigation fees payable under this section shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in any one calendar year unless the director petitions the superior court for the ability to continue the investigation, at which time the director shall demonstrate to the court’s satisfaction that further investigation is warranted, whereby the fees may exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 2.

31-44-10.
Penalty.

Any person who violates the licensing provisions of this chapter may be fined by the department an amount not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000), lose their license according to prescribed procedure, after a hearing. Provided, further, any person violating any of the provisions of this chapter may also be fined by the appropriate court according to existing court procedure.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 248, § 1.

31-44-11.
Fiscal autonomy.

All license and permit fees collected pursuant to this chapter, and any fines collected by the department of business regulation for violations related to licenses and permits shall be held and used as specified under §

31-44-1.6

. Any revenue received in excess of the department’s expenses used as specified in this chapter shall be carried forward as specified under §

31-44-1.6

(c).

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2; P.L. 1993, ch. 309, § 1.

31-44-12.
Severability.

If the provisions of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 382, § 2.

31-44-13.
Right of mobile home owners to peaceably assemble — Right to communicate.

No provision contained in any bylaw, rental agreement, regulation, or rule pertaining to a mobile home park shall infringe upon the right of the mobile home owners to peaceably assemble in an open public meeting for any lawful purpose, at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner, in the common areas or recreational areas of the mobile home park.

No provisions contained in any bylaw, rental agreement, regulation, or rule pertaining to a mobile home park shall infringe upon the right of the mobile home owners or tenants to communicate or assemble among themselves, at reasonable times and in a reasonable manner, for the purpose of discussing any problems relative to the mobile home park. The discussions may be held in the common areas or recreational areas of the park, including halls or centers, or in any resident’s home. In addition, the park owner or developer may not unreasonably restrict the use of any facility, including the use of utilities, when requested. Written notice must be provided to the mobile home park management and/or owner of the time and place for the assembly. The assembly shall be open to all park residents.

No provision contained in any bylaw, rental agreement, regulation, or rule pertaining to a mobile home park shall prohibit any mobile home owner of the mobile home park from canvassing mobile home owners of the mobile home park for the purposes described in this subsection. For the purposes of this subsection, the term “canvassing” includes an oral or written request; the distribution, circulation, posting, or publication of a notice; or a general announcement requesting the payment of membership dues or other matters relevant to the membership, federation, or organization. Canvassing shall be done at a reasonable time or times and in a reasonable manner. It is the intent of the legislature, through the enactment of this subsection, to prohibit any owner, developer, or manager of a mobile and manufactured home park from prohibiting free communication among mobile home owners or tenants in the guise of regulations or rules restricting or limiting canvassing for association, federation, or organization dues or other association, federation, or organization matters.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 160, § 1.

31-44-14.
Resident owned mobile home parks — Record keeping.

Resident owned mobile home parks shall maintain a copy of each of the following, where applicable, which shall constitute the official records of the association:

The plans, permits, warranties, and other items provided by the developer;

A photocopy of the resident association documents;

A copy of the current rules of the association;

A book or books containing the minutes as well as any tape recordings, if any, of all meetings of the association, of the board of directors, and of the unit owners, which minutes and tapes shall be retained for a period of not less than seven (7) years. Any tape recordings shall not be considered an official record, and these tapes shall be available to any member to be duplicated at the members’ cost and expense. The duplication cost shall not exceed ten dollars ($10.00) per tape;

A current roster of all unit owners and their mailing addresses, unit identification, and, if known, telephone numbers; street address;

All current insurance policies of the association, including a fiduciary bond of the association, and their agents;

A current copy of any management agreement, lease, or other contract to which the association is a party or under which the association or the unit owners have an obligation or responsibility;

Bills of sale or transfer for all property owned by the association;

Accounting records for the association and separate accounting records for each unit it operates, according to good accounting practices in accordance with generally acceptable accounting principles. All accounting records shall be maintained for a period of not less than seven (7) years:

Accurate, itemized, and detailed records of all receipts and expenditures.

A current account and a monthly, bimonthly, or quarterly statement of the account for each unit designating the name of the unit owner, the due date and amount of each assessment, the amount paid upon the account, and the balance due.

All audits, reviews, accounting statements, and financial reports of the association.

All contracts for work to be performed. Bids for work to be performed shall also be considered official records and shall be maintained for a period of one year.

Ballots, sign-in sheets, voting proxies, and all other papers relating to elections, which shall be maintained for a period of one year from the date of the meeting to which the document relates;

All rental records where the association is acting as agent for the rental unit.

The official records of the association shall be maintained in the city or town in which the resident owned association operates.

The official records of the association shall be open to inspection by any association member or the authorized representative of a member at all reasonable times. Failure to permit inspection of the association records as provided in this section entitles any person prevailing in an enforcement action to recover reasonable attorney’s fees from the person in control of the records who, directly or indirectly, knowingly denies access to the records for inspection. The right to inspect the records includes the right to make or obtain copies, at the reasonable expense, if any, of the association member.

Insurance. The association shall use its best efforts to obtain and maintain adequate insurance to protect the association property.

Financial report. Within sixty (60) days following the end of the fiscal or calendar year or annually on a date otherwise provided in the bylaws of the association, the board of directors of the association shall mail or furnish to each unit owner a complete financial report of actual receipts and expenditures for the previous twelve (12) months. The report shall show the amounts of receipts by accounts and receipt classification and shall show the amounts of expenses by accounts and classification including, but not limited to, the following:

Cost for security;

Professional and management fees and expenses;

Taxes;

Costs of recreation facilities;

Expenses for refuse collection and utilities;

Expenses for lawn care;

Costs for building maintenance and repair;

Insurance costs;

Administrative and salary expenses;

General reserves, maintenance reserves, and depreciation reserves;

Aging of all rental income and accounts payable.

Elections. The members of the resident owned mobile home park, responsible for tabulating votes cast in any election held by the resident owned mobile home park, shall do so at a time and place open for viewing by the members of the resident owned park, within the city or town in which the resident owned association operates.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 417, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 519, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 335, § 1.

31-44-15.
Purchase requirement.

All dealers and purchasers of new manufactured homes shall present or buy only housing urban and development (HUD) approved and compliant manufactured structures.

All dealers and purchasers of new manufactured homes are required to record with the local building official data plate wind zone information as part of the installation application. Local building officials shall consider data plate wind zone information as part of their inspection and enforcement process.

Owners of a home in a mobile- and manufactured-home park and owners of vacant lots in a mobile- and manufactured-home park shall not be prevented from replacing their existing home or placing a new home on a vacant lot notwithstanding any local zoning or land use ordinance to the contrary enacted subsequent to the establishment of the legally recognized lot on which the home is to be placed so long as all local and state building standards are satisfied and permits obtained.

History of Section.

P.L. 1994, ch. 269, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 428, § 1.

31-44-16.
Department of business regulation to hear matters.

The director of the department of business regulation, or his or her designee, shall hear matters involving mobile and manufactured housing park rules, specifically this chapter. The director shall not have jurisdiction over issues relative to rent increases or jurisdiction over evictions.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the right of the director to use the services of a mediator to resolve a dispute involving mobile/manufactured housing park rules.

History of Section.

P.L. 1996, ch. 94, § 1.